src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP !!≈ * **@CODE@**  caritives, no comparative
 :%>is ATTR ;
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
 :%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +Err/Orth:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n%> NPxC ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>eapmi%>X7n%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! :%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +Der1+Der2+Der/huvva:» UVVA_IV ;
 +Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-PLX:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>eamit K ;

LEXICON OATNI  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  only this adj, no attr
 :%> LAIKI0 ;
 :%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 :%> ADVV ;


!! ## Consonant-final even-syllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON TUVRRAHAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
! :ass    DEARVVASLAS2 ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aX4t K ; ! pga Oahpa og Use/NG
 +Cmp/Attr:%> R ;			! test this
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Ess:an%> NPxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 :sa%> HEAPMIOBL ;

LEXICON ISSORAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  issoras and certain as-adj. also derivations, final -s
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +Err/Orth: VUOHTA ; ! = issorvuohta
 :ass    DEARVVASLAS2 ;
 +Pl+Nom:assaX4t K ; ! pga Oahpa og Use/NG
 :assa%> ISSORASSA2- ;

LEXICON IHKALAS-DABALAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** loan adjectives ending on -ihkalaš - kritihkalaš etc
 :ihkal DABALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ihkkal DABALAS ;

LEXICON IIVVAL-DABALAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** loan adjectives ending on -iivvalaš
 :ijvval DABALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ijval DABALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:ivval DABALAS ;


LEXICON ISTTALAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** loan adjectives ending on -ihkalaš
 :isttal DABALAS ;
 +Err/Orth:istal DABALAS ;


LEXICON DABALAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**   -laš adjectives with short Attr and SgNom Comp forms - dábálet, dábálut etc
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
             :ažž DEARVVASLAS2 ;
     +Err/Orth-a-á:ážž  DEARVVASLAS2 ; ! This form (á pro a) is wrong but common. Sub.
             :ažža NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA- ;
     +Err/Orth-a-á:ážža ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA-  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  sublexicon to DABALAS
                        +Sg+Nom:            NPxVvowch           ; ! ! tentative.
               +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:t           K                   ;
                           +Ess:n           K                   ;
                           +Ess:n%>         NPxC                ; ! ! tentative, check.
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:X4b         K                   ;
  +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X4b         K                   ; ! Comp are also Attr.
                 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:X4b        NAMAT               ; ! comp-only adj, no compound.
                 +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Err/Orth:X4b#        NAMATLAGANLAGASCont ;
   +Der2+Der/Comp+A#+Err/Orth+Use/Circ+Cmp:X4b#        ALIT                ; ! both comp and independent adj
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X4bu        K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X4bu        K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:X4but       K                   ;
               +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Ess+Use/NG:X4bun       K                   ;
         +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:X4b»uš%>    ATTRCONT            ;
  +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:X4b»uš      K                   ;
         +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:X4b»užža%>  BUOREMUSSA-         ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:X4buj       K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X4bus       K                   ;
    +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4bun       K                   ; ! !SOUTH
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com+Use/NG:X4bujn      K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:X4bujd      K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:X4bujd      K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:X4bujdda    K                   ;
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:X4bujn      K                   ;
    +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4bujs      K                   ; ! !SOUTH
            +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com+Use/NG:X4bujgujn   K                   ;
                +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com/Sh:X4buj∑-     ENDLEX              ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc:X4bustti%>  NPxVvowch           ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com:X4bujnni%>  NPxVvowch           ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen:X4bujddi%>  NPxVvowch           ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc:X4bujddi%>  NPxVvowch           ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill:X4bujddás%> NPxC                ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc:X4bujnni%>  NPxVvowch           ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com:X4bujddi%>  NPxPlComV1          ;
        +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:X4but       K                   ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:X4bu%>      NPx1V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:X4bu%>      NPx2V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:X4bu%>      NPx3V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:X4bu%>      NPx1V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:X4bu%>      NPx2V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:X4bu%>      NPx3V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:X4bu%>      NPx1V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:X4bu%>      NPx2V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:X4bu%>      NPx3V               ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill:X4bu%>sa%>  NPxVvowch           ;
          +Der2+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:X4buiddá%>  NPx1V               ;
                 +Der2+Der/Superl+A+Use/NG:X4muss      BUOREMUS            ;
             +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:X4t         K                   ;
             +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:X8         K                   ;
    +Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv+Err/Orth:t           K                   ;
                                            LAS_OBL           ;

LEXICON LAS_OBL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X8 K ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:X4 R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:X8 R ;
 +Sg+Gen:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X6 NPx2V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X2s%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8st%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X8 K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom:X5jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:X5jd R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:^DISIMPjd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
 +Pl+Loc:^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:X5j∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com:X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;


LEXICON DEARVVASLAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  -laš adjectives without short Attr and SgNom Comp forms. The word dearvvaslaš/dearvvašlaš is not directed here, but to DABALAS

        DEARVVASLAS2 ;
 :a%> ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON DEARVVASLAS2  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  only to lift out ISSORASSA-, see DEARVVASLAS
 :%> ATTR ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Cmp/Attr:%> R ;			! test this
 +Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +Use/-PLX: VUOHTA ;

LEXICON STUORIBUS  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  -buš comparatives
 +Gram/Comp+Attr: K ;
 +Gram/Comp+Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Gram/Comp+A+Cmp/Attr+Use/-PLX:%> R ;	we overgenerate		! test this
! +Gram/Comp+A+Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +Gram/Comp+Use/-PLX: VUOHTA ;
 +Gram/Comp+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Gram/Comp:a%> EABBUCASE2 ;
