src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective !!= * **@CODE@** is a long list of lexicalised eahpe-prefixed adjs
eahpegovttolaš+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Hum:eahpe#govttol DABALAS ;
LEXICON AdjectiveNoPx !!= * **@CODE@** is the main adjective list, not taking Px
seđolaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:seđol DABALAS ;
bisovaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:bisovažž DEARVVASLAS ;
bisttiheapme+A+Sem/Dummytag:bistti7h JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
buorrindoallalas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:buorrin#doallal ISSORAS ;
deskriptiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:de^skript IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
diehttevaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:diehttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
dihtorlingvisttalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:dihtor#lingv ISTTALAS ;
duhtivaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duhtivažž DEARVVASLAS ;
duđuheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:duđuh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
dáiddolaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:dáiddol DABALAS ;
dáluhas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dáluhas TUVRRAHAS ;
eaimmaskas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eaimmask ISSORAS ;
elastihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:elast IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
etihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:et IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
fašisttalaš+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:fáš ISTTALAS ;
futuristtalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:futur ISTTALAS ;
fysihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:fys IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
stuorábuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:stuorábužž STUORIBUS ;
geaseheapme+A+Sem/Dummytag:geaseh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
gierdavaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gierdavažž DEARVVASLAS ;
gussolas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gussol ISSORAS ;
gággálaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gággál DABALAS ;
gáldokritihkalaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gáldo#krit IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
gárvveheapme+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:gárvvi7h JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
intensiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:intens IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
jiešlágalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:jiešlágal DABALAS ;
juoiggalmas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:juoiggalmass DEARVVASLAS ;
jávohisvuođageatnegas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:jávohisvuođa#geatneg ISSORAS ;
kognitiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ko^gnit IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
kollektiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth:kolekt IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
ieškritihkalaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ieš#krit IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
kultursensitiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:kultur#sensit IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
kvantitatiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:kvantitat IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
kásttaheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kásttah JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
lagabuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:lagabužž STUORIBUS ;
lingvisttalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:lingv ISTTALAS ;
luohkáhas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:luohkáhas TUVRRAHAS ;
luohkáhas+A+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:luohkkáhas TUVRRAHAS ;
mihtilmas+A+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:mihttilm ISSORAS ;
muoseheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:muoseh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
mystihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:myst IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
nationalisttalaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:našunal ISTTALAS ;
nohkkivaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:nohkkivažž DEARVVASLAS ;
nuohtalaš+A+CmpNP/First+Sem/Dummytag:nuohtal DABALAS ;
oatni+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oatni OATNI ; !
ohcalas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ohcal ISSORAS ;
olggubuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:olggubužž STUORIBUS ;
passiivvalaš+A+Err/Orth-a-á+Sem/Dummytag:páss IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
paternalisttalaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:paternal ISTTALAS ;
produktiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:produkt IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
realisttalaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:re^al ISTTALAS ;
rittubuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:rittubužž STUORIBUS ;
ruossalas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ruossal ISSORAS ;
ráhkaduslaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:ráhkadusl DABALAS ;
rájeheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:rájeh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
birasseastevaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:biras#seastevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
servodatkritihkalaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:servodat#krit IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
siskkibuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:siskkibužž STUORIBUS ;
skeptihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:skept IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
sosialisttalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:sosi^al ISTTALAS ;
stilistihkalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:stilist IHKALAS-DABALAS ;
stuorebuš+A+Sem/Hum:stuorebužž STUORIBUS ;
stáleheapme+A+Sem/Dummytag:stáleh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
subjektiivvalaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:subjekt IIVVAL-DABALAS  ;
sáltedoallevaš+A+Sem/Dummytag:sálte#doallevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
tuvrrahas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:tuvrrahas TUVRRAHAS ;
utnolaš+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:utnol DABALAS ;
veasttabuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:veasttabužž STUORIBUS ;
vuorjalas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuorjal ISSORAS ;
váribuš+A+Sem/Dummytag:váribužž STUORIBUS ;
áhčiheapme+A+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áhči7h JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
ávdugas+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ávdug ISSORAS ;
